Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8143.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-21 of the General Laws entitled "Retirement of Municipal
Employees" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-21-54.1. Optional post-retirement employment for certain public safety
administrators.
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Administrative position” means a police chief, deputy chief, assistant chief, fire chief,
deputy chief, assistant chief, fire marshal, public safety director, town manager, city manager, or
other department-head position designated as administrative by the retirement board by rule or
regulation.
(2) “Optional post-retirement employment election” means an affirmative written election
made by a public safety retiree under this section.
(3) “Public safety retiree” means a retired member of the municipal employees’ retirement
system who retired from service as a police officer or firefighter and is receiving a service
retirement allowance pursuant to this chapter.
(b) Optional election. Notwithstanding the provisions of § 45-21-54 or any general or
special law to the contrary, a public safety retiree may elect to be reemployed by a municipal
employer in an administrative position without limitation on the number of days worked or the
compensation earned, in lieu of the post-retirement employment limitations otherwise applicable
under this chapter.

(c) No additional retirement benefit. A retiree participating under this section:
(1) Shall not accrue additional service credit in the municipal employees’ retirement
system;
(2) Shall not be eligible for recalculation, enhancement, or increase of retirement benefits
as a result of such reemployment;
(3) Shall remain subject to all applicable federal tax requirements, including bona fide
termination of employment prior to retirement.
(d) Contribution requirement.
(1) A public safety retiree who elects optional post-retirement employment under this
section shall remit a contribution equal to five percent (5%) of the compensation earned during the
period of reemployment.
(2) The contribution shall be remitted to the employees’ retirement system of Rhode Island
by the employer in a manner prescribed by the retirement board.
(3) Contributions made pursuant to this subsection shall not be credited toward service
credit or used in the calculation of any retirement benefit.
(4) The contribution required under this subsection may be paid by the retiree, the
employer, or shared between the parties as determined by agreement.
(e) Age limitation. A public safety retiree shall not participate in optional post-retirement
employment under this section after attaining sixty-eight (68) years of age.
(f) Same position restriction. A retiree shall not retire and be reemployed under this section
in the same position held immediately prior to retirement.
(g) Rules and regulations. The retirement board shall promulgate such rules and regulations
as are necessary to implement and administer the provisions of this section, including verification
of eligible administrative positions, reporting procedures, contribution remittance, and compliance
with federal law.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005478
========
LC005478 - Page 2 of 3